New York, session 2025-2026, A10705.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph a of subdivision 6 of section 3602 of the educa- 2 tion law is amended by adding a new subparagraph 13 to read as follows: 3 (13) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, for 4 the purpose of computation of building aid for construction, recon- 5 struction or modernizing of no more than one project by the Arlington 6 central school district, multi-year cost allowances for the project 7 shall be established and utilized three times in the first five-year 8 period. Subsequent multi-year cost allowances shall be established no 9 sooner than fifteen years after establishment of the first maximum cost 10 allowance authorized pursuant to this subparagraph. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14166-02-5